Tennessee, session 114, HB0325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 15, Chapter 2, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
HB0325
002036
- 1 -

March 13 of every year is observed as "Father Charles Strobel Day", to honor his
mission and the valiant and noble strides Father Charles Frederick Strobel took to
combat homelessness in Tennessee, and the positive impact his efforts have had
nationwide.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002036